Hawaii statutes.
§286-23 Responsibility for compliance.
(a) Every owner or driver, upon receiving a citation as provided in section
286-22(b), shall comply therewith and shall within five days secure an official
certificate of inspection or make the necessary corrections or repairs, or the
driver may request a hearing as provided in section 286-22(d).

(b) [Subsection effective January 1, 2017.
For subsection effective until December 31, 2016, see main volume.] No
person shall operate any vehicle or moped after receiving a citation with
reference thereto as provided in section 286-22(b), except that if the driver
is authorized to do so by the police officer, the driver may return the vehicle
or moped to the driver's residence or place of business or the residence or place
of business of the owner of the vehicle or moped, or to an automotive repair
shop, if within a distance of twenty miles, until a certificate of inspection
is obtained or the necessary corrections or repairs are made. [L 1967, c 214,
pt of §2; HRS §286-23; gen ch 1985; am L 2016, c 200, §9]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next